West Virginia, session 2026, SB587.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. COMPENSATION OF ELECTED COUNTY OFFICIALS. §7-7-1. Legislative findings and purpose. (a) The Legislature finds that it has, since January 1, 2023, consistently and annually imposed upon the county commissioners, sheriffs, county and circuit clerks, assessors, and prosecuting attorneys in each county new and additional duties by the enactment of new provisions and amendments to this code. The new and additional duties imposed upon the aforesaid county officials by these enactments are such that they would justify the increases in compensation as provided in §7-7-4 of this code, without violating the provisions of W. Va. Const. Art. VI, §38.(b) The Legislature further finds that there are, from time to time, additional duties imposed upon all county officials through the acts of the Congress of the United States and that such acts constitute new and additional duties for county officials and, as such, justify the increases in compensation as provided by §7-7-4 of this code, without violating the provisions of W. Va. Const. Art. VI, §38.(c) The Legislature further finds that there is a direct correlation between the total assessed property valuations of a county on which the salary levels of the county commissioners, sheriffs, county and circuit clerks, assessors, and prosecuting attorneys are based, and the new and additional duties that each of these officials is required to perform as they serve the best interests of their respective counties. Inasmuch as the reappraisal of the property valuations in each county has now been accomplished, the Legislature finds that a change in classification of counties by virtue of increased property valuations will occur on an infrequent basis. However, it is the further finding of the Legislature that when such change in classification of counties does occur, that new and additional programs, economic developments, requirements of public safety and the need for new services provided by county officials all increase, that the same constitute new and additional duties for county officials as their respective counties reach greater heights of economic development, as exemplified by the substantial increases in property valuations and, as such, justify the increases in compensation provided in §7-7-4 of this code, without violating the provisions of W. Va. Const. Art. VI, §38.(d) The Legislature further finds and declares that the amendments enacted to this article are intended to modify the provisions of this article so as to cause the same to be in full compliance with the provisions of the Constitution of West Virginia and to be in full compliance with the decisions of the Supreme Court of Appeals of West Virginia. §7-7-4. Compensation of elected county officials and county commissioners for each class of county; effective date. (1) The increased salaries to be paid to the county commissioners and the other elected county officials described in this section on and after July 1, 2014, on and after July 1, 2022, and on and after July 1, 2026, are set out in subsections  (2) and  (4) of this section. Every county commissioner and elected county official in each county, whose term of office commenced prior to or on or after July 1, 2014, shall receive the same annual salary by virtue of legislative findings of extra duties as set forth in §7-7-1 of this code.(2) Prior to July 1, 2014:COUNTY COMMISSIONERSClass I $36,960Class II $36,300Class III $35,640Class IV $34,980Class V $34,320Class VI $28,380Class VII $27,720Class VIII $25,080Class IX $24,420Class X $19,800After June 30, 2014:COUNTY COMMISSIONERSClass I $41,395Class II $40,656Class III $39,917Class IV $39,178Class V $38,438Class VI $31,786Class VII $31,046Class VIII $28,090Class IX $27,350Class X $22,176	After June 30, 2022: COUNTY COMMISSIONERS Class I $45,535 Class II $44,722 Class III $43,909 Class IV $43,096 Class V $42,282 Class VI $34,965 Class VII $34,151 Class VIII $30,899Class IX $30,085Class X $24,394After June 30, 2026: COUNTY COMMISSIONERS Class I $47,812 Class II $46,958 Class III $46,104 Class IV $45,251 Class V $44,396Class VI $36,713 Class VII $35,859 Class VIII $32,444Class IX $31,589Class X $25,614(3) For the purpose of determining the salaries to be paid to the elected county officials of each county, the salaries for each county office by class, set out in subsection  (4) of this section, are established and shall be used by each county commission in determining the salaries of each of their county officials other than salaries of members of the county commission.(4) Prior to July 1, 2014: OTHER ELECTED OFFICIALS SheriffCounty ClerkCircuit ClerkAssessorProsecuting Attorney Class I$44,880$55,440$55,440$44,880$96,600 Class II$44,220$54,780$54,780$44,220$94,400 Class III$43,890$53,460$53,460$43,890$92,200 Class IV$43,560$53,154$53,154$43,560$90,000 Class V$43,230$52,800$52,800$43,230$87,800 Class VI$42,900$49,500$49,500$42,900$59,400 Class VII$42,570$48,840$48,840$42,570$56,760 Class VIII$42,240$48,180$48,180$42,240$54,120 Class IX$41,910$47,520$47,520$41,910$50,160 Class X$38,280$42,240$42,240$38,280$46,200 After June 30, 2014:OTHER ELECTED OFFICIALS SheriffCounty ClerkCircuit ClerkAssessorProsecuting Attorney Class I$50,266$62,093$62,093$50,266$108,192 Class II$49,526$61,354$61,354$49,526$105,728 Class III$49,157$59,875$59,875$49,157$103,264 Class IV$48,787$59,536$59,536$48,787$100,800 Class V$48,418$59,136$59,136$48,418$98,336 Class VI$48,048$55,440$55,440$48,048$66,528 Class VII$47,678$54,701$54,701$47,678$63,571 Class VIII$47,309$53,962$53,962$47,309$60,614 Class IX$46,939$53,222$53,222$46,939$56,179 Class X$42,874$47,309$47,309$42,874$51,744 After June 30, 2022:OTHER ELECTED OFFICIALS SheriffCounty ClerkCircuit ClerkAssessorProsecuting Attorney Class I$56,793$68,302$68,302$56,793$119,011 Class II$55,979$67,489$67,489$55,979$116,301 Class III$55,573$65,863$65,863$55,573$113,590 Class IV$55,166$65,485$65,485$55,166$110,880 Class V$54,760$65,050$65,050$54,760$108,170 Class VI$54,353$60,984$60,984$53,853$73,181 Class VII$53,946$60,171$60,171$53,446$69,928 Class VIII$53,540$59,358$59,358$52,940$66,675 Class IX$53,133$58,544$58,544$52,533$61,797 Class X$48,661$52,040$52,040$47,811$56,918 After June 30, 2026:OTHER ELECTED OFFICIALS SheriffCounty ClerkCircuit ClerkAssessorProsecuting Attorney Class I$59,633 $71,717 $71,717 $59,633 $124,962 Class II $58,778 $70,863 $70,863 $58,778 $122,116 Class III $58,352 $69,156 $69,156 $58,352 $119,270 Class IV $57,924 $68,759 $68,759 $57,924 $116,424 Class V $57,498 $68,303 $68,303 $57,498 $113,579 Class VI $57,071 $64,033 $64,033 $56,546 $76,840 Class VII $56,643 $63,180 $63,180 $56,118 $73,424 Class VIII $55,167 $62,326 $62,326 $55,587 $70,009 Class IX $55,790 $61,471 $61,471 $55,160 $64,887 Class X $51,094 $54,642 $54,642 $50,202 $59,764 (5) Any county clerk, circuit clerk, county assessor, prosecuting attorney, or sheriff of a Class I through Class V county, inclusive, any assessor or any sheriff of a Class VI through Class IX county, inclusive, shall devote full time to his or her public duties to the exclusion of any other employment: Provided, That any public official whose term of office begins when his or her county’s classification imposes no restriction on his or her outside activities may not be restricted on his or her outside activities during the remainder of the term for which he or she is elected.The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. To take effect July 1, 2026.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home